California statutes. Education Code
(4) The Executive Advisory Council shall regularly review the recommendations to the foster youth services plan required pursuant to subdivision (e).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 850, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 3223)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42923.

(a) As a condition of receiving funds, each county office of education and consortium of county offices of education providing a foster youth services coordinating program pursuant to this chapter shall, by May 15 of each even-numbered year, report to the Superintendent any information as may be required by the Superintendent and as accessible to the Foster Youth Services Coordinating Program for purposes of subdivision (b).

(b) The Superintendent shall, by July 1 of each even-numbered year, report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature and the Governor on the Foster Youth Services Coordinating Program. The report shall include, but not be limited to,
 all of the following:

(1) Recommendations regarding the effectiveness and continuation of the Foster Youth Services Coordinating Program.

(2) (A) To the extent possible, aggregate educational outcome data for each county in which there were at least 15 pupils in foster care who attended school in the county, with information on each of the following indicators:

(i) The number of pupils in foster care who attended school in the county.

(ii) The academic achievement of the pupils in foster care who attended school in the county, as determined by quantitative and qualitative data currently collected by program participants.

(iii) The number of pupils in foster care who were suspended or expelled.

(iv) The number of pupils in foster care who were placed in a juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or other county-operated juvenile detention facility because of an incident of juvenile delinquency.

(v) The truancy rates, attendance rates, and dropout rates for pupils in foster care.

(vi) (I) The number of pupils in foster care participating in foster youth services coordinating programs pursuant to this chapter who successfully transition to postsecondary education.

(II) The department shall collaborate with the
 Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the Chancellor of the California State University to identify indicators that can be used to track access to postsecondary education for pupils in foster care participating in a foster youth services coordinating program pursuant to this chapter.

(III) The number and percentage of pupils in foster care who successfully complete a Free Application for Federal Student Aid or California Dream Act Application while in grade 12.

(vii) The amount of funds allocated and expended by each foster youth services coordinating program in the previous two fiscal years.

(B) In meeting the requirement of this section, the Superintendent shall use data, where appropriate, reported pursuant
 to Section 49085.

(3) A discussion of the meaning and implications of the indicators contained in paragraph (2).

(4) Information about how the program has supported the development and implementation of new local educational agency and county agency policies, practices, and programs aimed at improving the educational outcomes of pupils in foster care.

(5) Information about how the program has improved coordination of services between local educational agencies and county agencies, including the types of services provided to pupils in foster care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 231, Sec. 2.   (SB 860)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

42924.

(a) The Foster Youth Services Coordinating Program shall not be operative unless funding is provided for this purpose in the annual Budget Act or another enacted statute.

(b) Any funds allocated to county offices of education or consortia of county offices of education for foster youth services coordinating programs pursuant to Section 42921 shall be used only for foster youth services coordinating programs and any funds not used by county offices of education for those services shall revert to the state General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 781, Sec. 7.   (AB 854)   Effective October 11, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

42925.

(a) As a condition of receiving funds, each county office of education and consortium of county offices of education with a foster youth services coordinating program operated pursuant to this chapter shall, to the extent possible, develop and enter into a memorandum of understanding, contract, or formal agreement with the county child welfare agency pursuant to which foster youth services coordinating program funds shall be used, to the maximum extent possible, to leverage funds received pursuant to Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.) and any other funds that may be used to specifically address the educational needs of pupils in foster care, or they shall explain in writing, annually, why a memorandum of understanding is not practical or feasible.

(b) To the extent possible, each foster youth services coordinating program is encouraged to consider leveraging other local funding opportunities to support the educational success of pupils in foster care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 60.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

42926.

(a) The Superintendent shall administer the Foster Youth Services Coordinating Program and shall be responsible for all of the following:

(1) Monitoring implementation of this chapter.

(2) Facilitating the data sharing and reporting necessary to meet the requirements of Section 42923.

(3) Reviewing a county office of education’s local control and accountability plan for any information pursuant to subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 42921.

(b) The Superintendent, upon approval
 from the Department of Finance, shall use up to 5 percent of funding allocated for the Foster Youth Services Coordinating Program to contract with a local educational agency to administer the program established pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, providing technical assistance to county offices of education and consortia of county offices of education as they implement this program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 781, Sec. 10.   (AB 854)   Effective October 11, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11.5. Financial Support for Educating Foreign Children [42950. - 42950.4.]

42950.

Any school district that provided education in kindergarten or grades 1 to 12, inclusive, pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 42950) of Part 24, may increase its revenue limit by an amount per unit of average daily attendance not to exceed the reimbursement received under a countywide tax levied for the local share of the revenue limit and for the excess cost of providing special programs for such children pursuant to statutes that existed in this code during the 1976–77 school year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 247.)
-------------------------------------------

42950.2.

Notwithstanding Section 42238 or any other provision of law, the revenue limit increases authorized by this chapter shall not be used in the computation of any maximum tax rate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 247.)
-------------------------------------------

42950.3.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply only to a school district which, during the 1977–78 school year:

(a) Had an enrollment not less than 10 percent of which consisted of children living in residence facilities operated by the University of California for the use of university students and their families.

(b) Reported at least 15 different native languages on the 1977 fall season R-30 enrollment and staff data report filed with the Department of Education.

(c) Did not receive, and was not entitled to receive, an apportionment of funds under the Bilingual Education Act of 1972 (Article 1 (commencing with Section 52100) of Chapter 7 of Part 28).

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 247.)
-------------------------------------------

42950.4.

It is the intent of the Legislature that school districts shall not identify pupils according to their immigration status in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 247.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. Voter-Approved Special Taxes for New School Facilities [43040. - 43052.]

43040.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply only to the Chino Unified School District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.   Effective July 13, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

43041.

(a) The provisions of this chapter shall govern the collection of special taxes which satisfy all the following requirements:

(1) The special tax has been approved, pursuant to Section 4 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, by two-thirds of the voters of the school district voting upon the proposition to authorize the governing board of the school district to levy the special tax.

(2) The special tax is levied against applicants for final building permits which authorize new construction within the school district.

(3) The proceeds of the special taxes are used for new school facilities.

(b) The sole purpose of this chapter is to govern the collection of legally imposed taxes. This chapter shall not be construed to grant, deny, extinguish, or recognize the authority to impose any tax, or to determine otherwise, expressly or impliedly, the legality of the imposition of any tax or to determine the character of any levy as a special tax or fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1187, Sec. 2.   Effective September 26, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

43042.

The governing body of a city or county which includes a school district in which special taxes for new school facilities have been approved shall not issue final building permits until such time as the governing board of such district certifies to the governing body that the special taxes have been paid or that arrangements for payment have been made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.   Effective July 13, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

43043.

If a final building permit is issued and the special tax for new school facilities construction has not been paid, the governing board of the district may, after appropriate notice that such tax is due and owing and after a hearing, with notice, on the issue, determine that the amount of the unpaid special tax constitutes a lien on each lot or parcel of land for which a final building permit has been issued and that such amount is now due and owing by the owner of such lot or parcel, as specified on the last equalized assessment roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.   Effective July 13, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

43044.

(a) The notice that the special tax for new school facilities is due and owing shall be published in accordance with Section 6063 of the Government Code, and shall be published prior to the date set for hearing.

(b) The notice shall set forth the following information:

(1) The special tax for new school facilities is due and owing.

(2) The amount of special tax due and owing.

(3) A description of the lot or parcel subject to such tax. Such description may be made by reference to a plat or diagram on file in the office of the county recorder, or by reference to maps prepared in accordance with Section 327 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and on file in the office of the county assessor. 

(4) The penalty, not to exceed an interest rate of 7 percent per annum, to be charged on the unpaid balance of such tax.

(5) Notification that, pending the hearing, the special tax and interest thereon may be determined to constitute a lien against each lot or parcel for which a building permit was issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.   Effective July 13, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

43045.

(a) At least 10 days prior to the date of hearing, the governing board of the school district shall send written notice of the hearing, by mail, to the owner of each parcel or lot, as specified on the last equalized assessment roll, for which the special tax for new school facilities is due and owing.

(b) The notice shall set forth the same information as required by subdivision (b) of Section 43044 and in addition shall set forth the time, date, and place of the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.   Effective July 13, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

43046.

(a) At the time, date, and place stated in the notice prescribed by Section 43045, the governing board of the school district shall hear and consider all objections or protests, if any, to the levy of the special tax, as set forth in such notice, and may continue the hearing from time to time.

(b) Upon conclusion of the hearing, the governing board shall determine whether the amount of the unpaid tax and the interest thereon constitutes a lien on the parcel or lot for which the final building permit was issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.   Effective July 13, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

43047.

(a) Within 30 days after the determination prescribed by paragraph (b) of Section 43046, the governing board of the school district shall record a certified copy of its determination with the county recorder of the county in which the lot or parcel is located.

(b) Upon recordation, the determination shall constitute a lien with the force, effect, and priority of a judgment lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.   Effective July 13, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

43048.

(a) If a lien has been created pursuant to this chapter, the governing board of the school district may, not later than four years after the due date of the last payment of the special taxes which are due and owing, order that the same be collected pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 681) of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) Costs incurred pursuant to this section shall be awarded to the prevailing party. Costs shall be fixed and allowed by the court. Costs shall include reasonable attorneys’ fees, interest, and other charges or advances authorized by law and shall be included in the judgment. The amount of costs, including penalties, shall be calculated up to the date of the judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.   Effective July 13, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

43049.

The following is exempt from the special taxes imposed by this chapter:

(a) Final permits to construct buildings on property that belongs to a federal agency.

(b) Final permits to construct buildings when such buildings are exempt from taxation under subdivisions (a) to (g), inclusive, of Section 3 of, and subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 4 of, Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(c) Final permits to construct buildings when the governing board of the school district certifies that satisfactory arrangements have been made between the governing board and the final building permit applicant to provide sufficient new school facilities for the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.   Effective July 13, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

43050.

When the proceeds of special taxes are used for construction of new school facilities, the State Allocation Board shall approve such construction, in accordance with building area and cost standards adopted by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.   Effective July 13, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

43051.

As to elections held after the effective date of this section, the governing board of the school district shall, prior to ordering an election, adopt a schedule that specifies the use of the proceeds of the special taxes. Such schedule shall include, but not be limited to, school sites proposed to be acquired and facilities proposed to be constructed. Such schedule shall be reviewed and updated at least annually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.   Effective July 13, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

43052.

Each governing board of a school district that receives the proceeds of special taxes pursuant to this chapter shall maintain a separate account for any such taxes paid and shall adopt a report, at the end of each fiscal year, showing the balance of such account, the school sites purchased during the previous fiscal year, and the facilities purchased or constructed during the previous fiscal year. Such report shall be adopted by September 1 of each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 489, Sec. 1.   Effective July 13, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 24.6. Instruction Support Grants [43520. - 43525.]



  CHAPTER 1. In-Person Instruction and Expanded Learning Opportunities Grants [43520. - 43525.]

43520.

It is the intent of the Legislature that local educational agencies offer in-person instruction to the greatest extent possible during the 2020–21 school year, consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 43504, and, starting in the 2020–21 school year and continuing into the 2022–23 school year, expand in-person instructional time and provide academic interventions and pupil supports to address barriers
 to learning and accelerate progress to close learning gaps. The Legislature strongly encourages local educational agencies to prioritize pupils who would benefit the most from in-person instruction and who have been identified as needing integrated supports or academic interventions, including, but not limited to, pupils with disabilities, youth in foster care, homeless youth, English language learners, pupils from low-income families, pupils without access to a computing device, software, and high-speed internet necessary to participate in online instruction, disengaged pupils, credit-deficient high school pupils, pupils at risk of dropping out, pupils with failing grades, and pupils identified as needing social and mental health supports.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 10, Sec. 2.   (AB 86)   Effective March 5, 2021.   Inoperative June 30, 2026, pursuant to Section 43525.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 43525.)
-------------------------------------------

43520.5.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Disengaged pupil” means a pupil identified for tiered reengagement strategies pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 43504.

(b) “Eligible for free or reduced-price meals” has the same meaning as in Section 42238.01.

(c) “English learner” has the same meaning as in Section 42238.01.

(d) “Foster youth” has the same meaning as in Section 42238.01.

(e) “Homeless pupil” means a pupil who meets the definition of “homeless children and youths” in subsection (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)).

(f) (1) “In-person instruction” means instruction under the immediate physical supervision and control of a certificated employee of the local educational agency while engaged in
 educational activities required of the pupil.

(2) In-person instruction may include hybrid models offering fewer than five days per week of in-person instruction, as described in paragraph (1), only if the local educational
 agency offers in-person instruction to the greatest extent possible pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 43504.

(g) “Individual with exceptional needs” has the same meaning as in Section 56026.

(h) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(i) “Pupils at risk of abuse, neglect, or exploitation” means pupils who are so identified in a written referral from a legal, medical, or social service agency, or emergency shelter.

(j) “Supplemental instruction” means the instructional programs provided in addition to and complementary to the regular instructional
 programs, including services provided pursuant to an individualized education program, offered or provided by a local educational agency.

(k) “Support” means interventions provided as a supplement to those regularly provided, including services provided pursuant to an individualized education program, that are designed to meet pupils’ needs for behavioral, social, emotional, and other integrated pupil supports, in order to enable pupils to engage in and benefit from the supplemental instruction provided pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 10, Sec. 2.   (AB 86)   Effective March 5, 2021.   Inoperative June 30, 2026, pursuant to Section 43525.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 43525.)
-------------------------------------------

43521.

(a) The sum of four billion five hundred forty-one million one hundred thirteen thousand dollars ($4,541,113,000) from the General Fund, and the sum of two billion sixteen million three hundred thirty thousand dollars ($2,016,330,000) from the Federal Trust Fund, are hereby appropriated to the Superintendent for apportionment in the 2020–21 fiscal year pursuant to this chapter. Funds apportioned to eligible local educational agencies from the Federal Trust Fund pursuant to this subdivision shall be used for costs dating back to March 13, 2020, and be consistent with the terms, tracking and reporting requirements, and period of fund availability in accordance with federal law for all of the following:

(1) Six hundred seventy million nine hundred sixty-three thousand
 dollars ($670,963,000) from the Elementary and Secondary School Emergency Relief Fund pursuant to the federal Coronavirus Response and Relief Supplemental Appropriations Act, 2021, (Public Law 116-260) available for obligation through September 30, 2023, unless otherwise provided in federal law.

(2) One hundred fifty-three million nine hundred ninety-two thousand dollars ($153,992,000) from the Governor’s Emergency Education Relief Fund pursuant to the federal Coronavirus Response and Relief Supplemental Appropriations Act, 2021, (Public Law 116-260) available for obligation through September 30, 2023, unless otherwise provided in federal law.

(3) Four hundred thirty-seven million three hundred ninety thousand dollars ($437,390,000) from the Elementary and Secondary School Emergency Relief Fund pursuant to the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-2) available
 for obligation through September 30, 2024, unless otherwise provided in federal law. For the purposes of Section 2001(f)(4) of the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-2), this constitutes the state’s reserve of funds for emergency needs.

(4) Seven hundred fifty-three million nine hundred eighty-five thousand dollars ($753,985,000) from the Elementary and Secondary School Emergency Relief Fund state level reservation to address learning loss, pursuant to the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-2) available for obligation through September 30, 2024, unless otherwise provided in federal law. For the purposes of Section 2001(f)(1) of the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-2), this constitutes the state’s reserve of funds to carry out activities to address learning loss.

(b) Of the amount appropriated pursuant to
 subdivision (a), four billion five hundred fifty-seven million four hundred forty-three thousand dollars ($4,557,443,000) shall be apportioned to local educational agencies and state special schools in the following manner:

(1) A local educational agency shall receive one thousand dollars ($1,000) per homeless pupil enrolled in the 2020–21 fiscal year as reported in the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System as of the 2020–21 Fall 1 Submission.

(2) A state special school shall receive seven hundred twenty-five dollars ($725) for each unit of average daily attendance as of the 2020–21 second principal apportionment certification. The average daily attendance for each state special school shall be deemed to be 97 percent of the enrollment as reported in the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System as of the 2020–21 Fall 1 Submission.

(3) (A) The funds remaining after the apportionments in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be apportioned proportionally on the basis of a local educational agency’s local control funding formula entitlement determined as of the 2020–21 second principal apportionment certification, pursuant to Sections 42238.02 and 42238.025, or subdivision (e) of Section 2574 or subdivision (a) of Section 2575, as applicable. For purposes of this paragraph, entitlements shall include apportionments allocated pursuant to Section 41544 and Article 7 (commencing with Section 48300) of Chapter 2 of Part 27.

(B) Consistent with Section 2576, a county office of education’s local control funding formula entitlement for purposes of subparagraph (A) shall include funding that the Superintendent transferred to the county where a pupil is enrolled, equal to the amount calculated for the school
 district of residence pursuant to Section 42238.02 for each unit of average daily attendance credited to the school district of residence as of the 2020–21 second principal apportionment certification.

(c) (1) Of the amount appropriated from the General Fund pursuant to subdivision (a), two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000) shall be apportioned to local educational agencies, excluding a charter school classified as a nonclassroom-based charter school as of the 2019–20 second principal apportionment certification pursuant to Section 47612.5, based on the apportionment methodology described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).

(2) (A) A local educational agency’s apportionment of funds pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be reduced pursuant to subparagraph (B) if the local educational agency does not provide in-person instruction pursuant to
 paragraph (3).

(B) (i) From April 1, 2021, to May 15, 2021, inclusive, a local educational agency’s apportionment of funds pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be reduced by 1 percent for each day of instruction provided for in the school calendar that the local educational agency does not provide in-person instruction pursuant to paragraph (3), as identified in the school calendar adopted for the 2020–21 school year that is in effect on March 1, 2021.

(ii) If a local educational agency does not provide in-person instruction pursuant to paragraph (3) on or before May 15, 2021, it shall forfeit all funds apportioned pursuant to paragraph (1).

(iii) If a local educational agency does not offer continuous in-person instruction for pupils pursuant to subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (3)
 from when it commences offering in-person instruction through the end of the scheduled 2020–21 school year, unless otherwise ordered by a state or local health officer, it shall forfeit all funds apportioned pursuant to paragraph (1). The scheduled school year is the adopted school calendar for the 2020–21 school year that is in effect on March 1, 2021.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, a local educational agency shall be considered to be offering in-person instruction if it does at least all of the following:

(A) For a local educational agency in a county in the purple tier pursuant to the State Department of Public Health’s Blueprint for a Safer Economy that is neither open nor eligible to open as defined in the COVID-19 industry sector guidance for schools and school-based programs, the local educational agency offers optional in-person instruction pursuant to the State
 Department of Public Health’s Guidance Related to Cohorts to all pupils who are individuals with exceptional needs, if consistent with each pupil’s individualized education program, and to all prioritized pupil groups described in paragraph (4), unless the number of pupils in the prioritized pupil groups seeking in-person instruction exceeds the practical capacity of a local educational agency to maintain health and safety pursuant to its COVID-19 safety plan, in which case the local educational agency may limit the number of pupils within the prioritized pupil groups that receive in-person instruction to its maximum practical capacity.

(B) For elementary schools, for kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, as applicable, the following applies:

(i) For a local educational agency in a county in the purple tier pursuant to the State Department of Public Health’s Blueprint for a
 Safer Economy, when eligible pursuant to COVID-19 industry sector guidance for schools and school-based programs, the local educational agency offers optional in-person instruction to all pupils required to be offered in-person instruction pursuant to subparagraph (A), and to all pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 and 2.

(ii) When eligible pursuant to COVID-19 industry sector guidance for schools and school-based programs to provide in-person instruction for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, the local educational agency offers optional in-person instruction to all pupils required to be offered in-person instruction pursuant to clause (i), and to all pupils in grade 3 through the highest elementary school grade, up to grade 6, inclusive.

(C) For middle schools and high schools, for grades 6 to 12, inclusive, as applicable, when eligible pursuant to COVID-19 industry
 sector guidance for schools and school-based programs to provide in-person instruction for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, the local educational agency offers optional in-person instruction to all pupils required to be offered in-person instruction pursuant to subparagraph (A), and to all pupils in at least one full grade level.

(D) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), for a local educational agency in a county in the purple tier pursuant to the State Department of Public Health’s Blueprint for a Safer Economy, the local educational agency conducts asymptomatic testing for staff and pupils participating in in-person instruction consistent with the state-supported cadences set forth in the COVID-19 industry sector guidance for schools and school-based programs.

(ii) The requirement in clause (i) does not apply if, on or before March 31, 2021, the
 local educational agency is providing in-person instruction or the governing board or body of the local educational agency has adopted a plan to provide in-person instruction and has publicly posted its COVID-19 safety plan on its internet website. A local educational agency in a county that moves from the purple tier into the red, orange, or yellow tier pursuant to the State Department of Public Health’s Blueprint for a Safer Economy, is not required to maintain asymptomatic testing for staff and pupils participating in in-person instruction consistent with the state-supported cadences set forth in the COVID-19 industry sector guidance for schools and school-based programs.

(4) For the purposes of this subdivision, “prioritized pupil groups” shall include all of the following:

(A) Pupils at risk for abuse, neglect, or exploitation.

(B) Homeless pupils.

(C) Foster youth.

(D) English learners.

(E) Pupils without access to a computing device, software, and high-speed internet necessary to participate in online instruction, as determined by the local educational agency.

(F) Disengaged pupils.

(5) On or before June 1, 2021, a local educational agency shall certify its compliance with paragraph (3) using a form the State Department of Education shall provide for this purpose. The State Department of Education shall make this form available publicly on its internet website on or before May 1, 2021.

(6) (A) The State Department of Education’s calculation of a local educational agency’s apportionment of remaining state funds pursuant to subdivision (f) shall include a reduction equal to the amount of funds reduced pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) or forfeited pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).

(B) Any funds reduced pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) or forfeited pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) shall be redistributed in the calculations made pursuant to paragraph (1).

(d) A local educational agency receiving funds pursuant to this section shall comply with the requirements of Section 43503 for all pupils participating in distance learning, instructional time requirements pursuant to Section 43501 for the 2020–21 school year, and
 applicable instructional day requirements pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 46100) of Part 26 of Division 4 for the 2021–22 school year.

(e) Within 15 days of March 5, 2021, the State Department of Education shall notify each local educational agency and state special school of its estimated apportionments under subdivisions (b) and (c), as applicable.

(f) (1) State funds apportioned to a local educational agency or state special school pursuant to this section shall be provided by the Controller to the local educational agency or state special school as follows:

(A) In May 2021, an amount equal to 50 percent of the amount determined under subdivision (e) for the local educational agency or state special school using 2020–21 first principal apportionment certification data and
 2020–21 preliminary California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System Fall 1 data.

(B) On or before December 31, 2021, the remaining amount of state funds owed under this section, after reductions pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (c), to the local educational agency or state special school using 2020–21 second principal apportionment data and 2020–21 final California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System Fall 1 data. If based on the final data, the amount paid by the Controller in May 2021 exceeds the amount of state funding owed to a local educational agency, the State Department of Education may offset the local educational agency’s monthly principal apportionment payment to recover the overpayment of state funds.

(2) State funds apportioned to a local educational agency or state special school pursuant to this section shall be available for expenditure through
 September 30, 2024. Federal funds apportioned to a local educational agency or state special school pursuant to this section shall be available for expenditure pursuant to the period of fund availability specified in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(g) Neither the funding conditions or other requirements established in this chapter or Article 8 (commencing with Section 32090) of Chapter 1 of Part 19 of Division 1 of Title 1, nor the issuance of any nonmandatory guidance by the State Department of Public Health shall be construed as creating or establishing an affirmative obligation for a local educational agency to revise its completed COVID-19 safety plan that is publicly posted on its internet website on or before March 31, 2021.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c), a charter school that has ceased operation on or before March 5, 2021, shall not be
 allocated funding pursuant to this section.

(i) For purposes of apportionments made pursuant to this section from federal funds described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a), funding for a locally funded charter school shall be included in the apportionment of the chartering authority.

(j) (1) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, of the amount appropriated from the General Fund in subdivision (a), one billion three hundred sixty-four million nine hundred thirty-one thousand dollars ($1,364,931,000) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2019–20 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund
 proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2019–20 fiscal year.

(2) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, of the amount appropriated from the General Fund in subdivision (a), three billion one hundred seventy-six million one hundred eighty-two thousand dollars ($3,176,182,000) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 252, Sec. 12.   (AB 167)   Effective September 23, 2021.   Inoperative June 30, 2026, pursuant to Section 43525.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 43525.)
-------------------------------------------

43522.

(a) (1) A local educational agency receiving funds under subdivision (b) of Section 43521 shall implement a learning recovery program that, at a minimum, provides supplemental instruction, support for social and emotional well-being, and, to the maximum extent permissible under the guidelines of the United States Department of Agriculture, meals and snacks to, at a minimum, pupils who are eligible for free or reduced-price meals, English learners, foster youth, homeless pupils, pupils who are individuals with exceptional needs, pupils at risk of abuse, neglect, or exploitation, disengaged pupils, and pupils who are below grade level, including, but not limited to, those who did not enroll in kindergarten in the 2020–21 school year, credit-deficient pupils, high school pupils at risk of not graduating, and
 other pupils identified by certificated staff.

(2) Consistent with the plan created pursuant to subdivision (e), a local educational agency shall plan supplemental instruction and support in a tiered framework that bases universal, targeted, and intensive supports on pupils’ needs for academic, social-emotional, and other integrated pupil supports, and provides the services through a program of engaging learning experiences in a positive school climate.

(b) Specifically, funds received under subdivision (b) of Section 43521 shall be expended only for any of the following purposes:

(1) Notwithstanding Section 37202, instructional learning time in addition to what is required pursuant to Part 24.5 (commencing with Section 43500) of Division 3 for the 2020–21 school year and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 46100) of
 Part 26 of, or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 47610) of Part 26.8 of, Division 4, and Section 300.106 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations for the 2021–22 and the 2022–23 school years by increasing the number of instructional days or minutes provided during the school year, providing summer school or intersessional instructional programs, or taking any other action that increases the amount of instructional time or services provided to pupils based on their learning needs.

(2) Accelerating progress to close learning gaps through the implementation, expansion, or enhancement of learning supports including, but not limited to, any of the following:
